Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1507
Public agency; appropriate funds; provide personnel.

Any public agency entering into an agreement may appropriate funds for, and may sell, lease, or otherwise give or supply material to, any entity created for the purpose of performance of the agreement and may provide such personnel or services as are within its legal power to furnish.

Laws 1989, LB 508, § 7.